Arkansas, session 2025, SB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-95-208 is amended to read as follows:
17-95-208. Rules on physician's authority to delegate.
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall adopt rules that establish
standards to be met and procedures to be followed by a physician or a
physician assistant with respect to the physician's delegation of the
performance of medical practices to a qualified and properly trained employee
who is not licensed or otherwise specifically authorized by the Arkansas Code
to perform the practice.
(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a) of this section shall
provide that:
(1) The delegating physician or a physician assistant remains
responsible for the acts of the employee performing the delegated practice;
(2) The employee performing the delegated practice shall not be
represented to the public as a licensed physician, licensed nurse, licensed
physician's assistant, or other licensed healthcare provider; and
(3) Medical practices delegated under this section shall be
performed under the physician's supervision of the physician or physician
assistant.
*JMB093*
01/23/2025 3:36:42 PM JMB093

SB99
(c) Delegation of medical practices under this section may include
administration of drugs that do not require substantial specialized judgment
and skill based on knowledge and application of the principles of biological,
physical, and social sciences as determined by the board.
(d) Rules adopted regarding the delegation of the administration of
drugs shall provide for:
(1) The delegated administration of drugs only within the
physical boundaries of the office in which the delegating physician's offices
physician or physician assistant practices;
(2) Evaluation of whether delegation is appropriate according to
the acuity of the patient involved;
(3) Training and competency requirements that shall be met by
the person administering the drugs; and
(4) Other standards and procedures the board considers relevant.
(e) The board shall not adopt rules that:
(1) Authorize a physician to transfer to a health professional
other than another a physician or physician assistant the physician's
responsibility for supervising a delegated medical practice;
(2) Authorize an individual to whom a medical practice is
delegated to delegate the performance of that practice to another individual;
(3) Authorize a physician to delegate the administration of
anesthesia; or
(4)(3) Conflict with a provision of the Arkansas Code that
specifically authorizes an individual to perform a particular practice.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-105-107, concerning the scope of
authority and delegatory authority of a physician assistant, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) A physician assistant may delegate certain tasks as authorized
under § 17-95-208 and the rules of the Arkansas State Medical Board.






01/23/2025 3:36:42 PM JMB093